Utah statutes.
10-8-76.   Noise abatement -- Street performances.

They may prevent the ringing of bells, blowing of horns and bugles, crying of goods by auctioneers and others, and the making of other noises, for the purpose of business, amusement or otherwise, and prevent all performances and devices tending to the collection of persons on the streets or sidewalks of the city.

